Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Nature Preserves System

146.410.
Purpose of system of nature preserves.

All areas within the borders of the Commonwealth, except those which are expressly dedicated by law for preservation and protection in their natural condition, are subject to alteration by human activity. As part of the continuing growth of the population and the economic development of the Commonwealth, it is necessary and desirable that the overall impact on the natural ecology be considered when major alterations are proposed affecting same, and that certain areas of unusual natural significance be set aside and preserved for the benefit of present and future generations. Such unique areas are valuable as laboratories for scientific research, as reservoirs of natural materials not all of the uses of which are now known, as habitats for plant and animal species and biotic communities, as living museums of the native landscape where people may observe nature’s web of life and our natural heritage, as places of historic and natural interest and scenic beauty, and as reminders of the vital human dependence upon fresh air, clean water, and unspoiled natural areas.

It is therefore the public policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to secure for the people of present and future generations the benefits of an enduring resource of natural areas by establishing a system of nature preserves, protecting these areas and gathering and disseminating information regarding them, establishing and maintaining a registry of natural areas, and otherwise encouraging and assisting in the preservation of natural areas and features.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 2.

146.415.
Definitions for KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

As used in KRS 146.410 to 146.530:

“Natural area” means any area of land or water, or of both land and water, in public or private ownership, which either retains, or has reestablished to some degree in the judgment of the office its natural character, though it need not be completely natural and undisturbed, or which has natural flora, fauna, biological, ecological, geological, scenic or archaeological features of scientific, aesthetic, cultural or educational interest;

“Nature preserve” means a natural area, and land necessary for its protection, any estate, interest or right in which has been formally dedicated under the provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530 to be maintained as nearly as possible in its natural condition and to be used in a manner and under limitations consistent with its continued preservation, without impairment, disturbance or artificial development, for the public purposes of present and future scientific research, education, aesthetic enjoyment and habitat for plant and animal species and other natural objects;

“Articles of dedication” means the writing by which any estate, interest or right in a natural area is formally dedicated, as provided in KRS 146.410 to 146.530;

“Office” means the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves;

“System” means the state system of nature preserves established under KRS 146.410 to 146.530;

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Executive director” means the executive director of the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch 118, § 3; 1988, ch. 416, § 1, effective June 1, 1988; 2010, ch. 24, § 133, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 10, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 22, effective July 14, 2018.

146.420.
Establishment of system.

A state system of nature preserves is established. The system shall consist of nature preserves dedicated as provided in KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 4.

146.425.
Kentucky Nature Preserves Commission. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 5; 1978, ch. 384, § 28, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 416, § 2, effective June 1, 1988; repealed by 2018 ch. 29, § 65, effective July 14, 2018.

146.430.
Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves — Executive director — Employees.

The Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves is hereby created within the office of the secretary to carry out the purposes of KRS 146.200 to 146.619. In order to effectuate and administer KRS 146.200 to 146.619, the secretary may appoint a full-time executive director who shall be qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of this office and carry out the purpose of KRS 146.200 to 146.619, and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the secretary. The salary of the director shall be determined by the secretary. The executive director shall employ and fix the compensation of such personnel as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.619.

The executive director shall, upon the advice and consent of the secretary, provide for the allocation of the work and activities of all employees of the office.

If federal or other grant funds become available to pay their salaries, the executive director may appoint and employ other persons that may be deemed necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of KRS 146.200 to 146.619. The executive director shall determine the compensation, duties, and terms of employment of these employees, and grant-funded, time-limited positions shall be approved by the secretary as needed. Employees whose salaries are funded through federal or other grant funds shall not be counted in any tally of permanent employees made for employee cap or budgetary purposes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 23; 2017 ch. 117, § 11, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 23, effective July 14, 2018.

146.435.
Advisors to office.

Representatives of such agencies, institutions, organizations or individuals as the office may determine may serve as advisors to the office with the privilege of discussion and debate. Such advisors may receive such compensation as is deemed appropriate by the office.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 6; 2018 ch. 29, § 24, effective July 14, 2018.

146.440.
Uses and purposes of nature preserves and natural areas.

In order to secure for the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky of present and future generations the benefits of an environment having one or more of the characteristics of a natural area, the office is hereby empowered to acquire in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and to hold in trust for the benefit of the general public an adequate system of nature preserves and natural areas in the manner herein set forth, and for the following uses and purposes:

For scientific research in such fields as, but not limited to, ecology, taxonomy, genetics, forestry, pharmacology, agriculture, soil science, geology, paleontology, ornithology, herpetology, mammalogy, biology, entomology, agronomy, conservation, and all other natural sciences;

For the teaching of biology, natural history, ecology, geology, conservation and other related subjects;

As habitats for plant and animal species and other natural objects;

As reservoirs of natural materials;

As places of natural interest and beauty;

As living illustrations of our natural heritage wherein one may observe and experience natural biotic and ecological systems of the earth and their processes;

To promote understanding and appreciation of the aesthetic, cultural, scientific and spiritual values of our unpolluted and unspoiled environment;

For the preservation and protection of nature preserves against modification or encroachment resulting from occupation, development or other use which would destroy their natural or aesthetic conditions;

As places where people may observe nature’s web of life and our natural heritage, and as reminders of the vital human dependence upon unspoiled natural areas.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 7; 2018 ch. 29, § 25, effective July 14, 2018.

146.445.
Coordination of activities of office and cabinet.

The office and the cabinet shall coordinate the activities of the office and those of the cabinet in an effective and practical manner, allocating those activities and functions pertaining to preservation and use of natural areas to the office.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 8; 2018 ch. 29, § 26, effective July 14, 2018.

146.450.
Powers and duties of office.

To effectuate the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, the office has the powers and duties enumerated as follows:

To enforce rules pertaining to public use of and activities on nature preserves, and on any real property held by the office;

To acquire by gift, devise, purchase, grant, agreement, dedication, and transfer the fee simple title, or any lesser right or interest, in real property containing natural areas, including but not limited to leasehold estates, easements, and licenses granting to the office specified rights of use or licenses denying to the grantor specified rights of use, or both, and to dedicate the same to the system of nature preserves as provided in KRS 146.410 to 146.530;

To dedicate in the manner provided for in KRS 146.410 to 146.530 real property held by it as nature preserves;

To transfer from or to the office real property or any interests or rights therein.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 9; 2018 ch. 29, § 27, effective July 14, 2018.

146.455.
Allocation of funds.

Funds available for use by the cabinet for land acquisition, or for other designated activities, if not otherwise restricted, may be allocated by the cabinet to the office for land acquisition, or other herein authorized activities.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 10; 2018 ch. 29, § 28, effective July 14, 2018.

146.460.
Public register of natural areas.

The office shall establish and publish a public register of natural areas which shall include areas other than nature preserves considered by the office to be particularly worthy of preservation for the public purposes of present and future scientific research, education, scenic and aesthetic enjoyment or which provide habitat and protection for plant and animal species and communities and other natural features. No natural area shall be construed to be unworthy of preservation because it is not included in the register. Publication of the register is notice to all public agencies that the registered natural areas are worthy of preservation. No area so registered shall be a nature preserve unless and until it shall have been dedicated as provided for in KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 11; 2018 ch. 29, § 29, effective July 14, 2018.

146.465.
Acquisition of land or interest in land — Buffer areas — Articles of dedication.

The office is authorized and empowered for and on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:

To accept and administer gifts, grants, devises and bequests of money, securities or property to be used by the office for the purposes of KRS 146.200 to 146.619.

To acquire natural areas by gift, devise, purchase or exchange, provided that any interest owned by the Commonwealth or by any subdivision thereof may be dedicated only by voluntary act of the agency having jurisdiction thereof.

To acquire the fee simple interest or any one or more lesser estates, interests and rights therein, including, but not limited to, leasehold estates, easements, and licenses either granting the Commonwealth specified rights of use or licenses denying to the grantor specified rights of use, or both. Lesser than fee simple estates, particularly scenic easements, should be sought in the establishment of trails or other narrow or elongated or extensive uses.

For the purpose of protecting a nature preserve, adjoining land that is not otherwise suitable for dedication as part of the nature preserve may be dedicated as buffer area in the same manner as provided in KRS 146.410 to 146.530 for the dedication of a nature preserve. A dedicated buffer area shall have the same protection under KRS 146.410 to 146.530 as a nature preserve.

An estate, interest or right in a natural area may be dedicated by any agency of the Commonwealth having jurisdiction thereof, by any other unit of government within the state having jurisdiction thereof, and by private owners thereof in the same manner as the ordinary conveyance of land. A dedication shall be deemed effective, and a natural area shall become a nature preserve only upon the acceptance of the articles of dedication by the office. Articles of dedication shall be placed on public record in the proper place for recording deeds in the county or counties in which the area is located, and with the office at its Frankfort office.

Articles of dedication may contain restrictions relating to management, use, development, transfer, and public access, as well as such other provisions as may be necessary to further the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530. Specifically, the donor, devisor or grantor of the preserve may prescribe the places where, and the means by which, the public may secure access to the preserve so as to protect the preserve from overuse and maintain the unencumbered private use of undedicated lands adjoining the preserve. The articles may likewise provide penalties and procedures to be applied in case of violation of their provisions. The articles may recognize and create reversionary rights, transfers upon conditions, and gifts. The articles may vary in provisions from one nature preserve to another in accordance with differences in the characteristics and conditions of the areas involved, or for other reasons found necessary by the office and the landowner.

Upon such terms and conditions as the office may determine, the office may enter into amendments of any articles of dedication upon a finding by the office that such amendments will not permit an impairment, disturbance, use or development of the area inconsistent with the purposes of the articles of dedication or of KRS 146.410 to 146.530; provided, however, that if the fee simple interest in the area is not held by the Commonwealth of Kentucky under KRS 146.410 to 146.530, no amendment shall be made without the written consent of the owner or owners of the other interests therein.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 12; 2018 ch. 29, § 30, effective July 14, 2018.

146.470.
Dedication of areas as nature preserves.

Public departments, commissions, boards, counties, municipalities, corporations, colleges, universities and all other agencies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions are empowered, and urged to dedicate suitable areas within their jurisdictions as nature preserves.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 13.

146.475.
Nature preserves to be held in trust.

The fee simple estates, or lesser interests, or other contractual rights held as nature preserves are hereby declared to be held in trust, in the name of the Commonwealth, for those uses and purposes expressed in KRS 146.410 to 146.530 which are not prohibited by the articles of dedication, for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky of present and future generations and are declared to be put to their highest, best and most important use for the public benefit. Said estates, interests, or rights held as nature preserves shall be managed and protected in the manner approved by, and subject to the rules and regulations established by the office, and they shall not be taken by another public body through eminent domain or otherwise for any other use, except after a finding by the office of the existence of an imperative and unavoidable public necessity for such other public use. Except as may otherwise be provided in the articles of dedication, the office may grant or dispose of an estate, interest or right held in a nature preserve only after a finding by the office of the existence of an imperative and unavoidable public necessity for such grant or disposition; provided however, that where less than a fee simple interest has been dedicated, such disposition or grant shall also require the written consent of the owner or owners of the other interests therein.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 14; 2018 ch. 29, § 31, effective July 14, 2018.

146.480.
Notification by office of proposed action.

Before the office shall make any findings of the existence of an imperative and unavoidable public necessity, or shall grant or dispose of any estate, interest or right in a nature preserve, or shall enter into any amendment of any articles of dedication, it shall give notice of such proposed action in accordance with Chapter 424 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 15; 2018 ch. 29, § 32, effective July 14, 2018.

146.485.
Powers and duties of office.

In furtherance of the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, the office shall have the following additional powers and duties:

To seek and approve the dedication of nature preserves as part of the system;

To make and publish policies and rules, and to recommend to the secretary the promulgation of administrative regulations for the selection, acquisition, management, protection, and use of natural areas and nature preserves, and for the conduct of office affairs;

To cooperate with and to contract with any public body of this state, any public body of any other state, any private organization, any individual, and the federal government and its agencies;

To purchase land from a willing seller without the use of the powers of condemnation or eminent domain, which said powers are expressly denied to the office;

To make reasonable investigations as to the ownership of any lands which it judges may be appropriate for acquisition;

To maintain a state registry of natural areas, an inventory of natural types, flora, and fauna, and other records of natural areas and nature preserves within the Commonwealth;

To promote the coordination of all departments, divisions and branches of state, county and city governments within the Commonwealth which relate to nature preserves;

To study the operation of all laws, rules, regulations, orders, and governmental policies affecting conservation of natural resources pertaining to natural areas, and to recommend to the Governor, and to the General Assembly, new legislation, rules, regulations, orders and policies in the interest of correcting natural resource conservation problems pertaining to natural areas and nature preserves;

To provide a central clearing house of information for environmental and conservation matters and to promote educational programs pertaining to natural areas and nature preserves;

To conduct research, investigations, public hearings, and interpretative programs and to publish and disseminate information to the general public pertaining to natural areas and nature preserves;

To supervise the protection, management, and use of nature preserves and to enforce and administer rules and regulations pertaining thereto;

To promote, study, investigate, recommend, encourage, advise and assist in the preservation, protection, and management of natural areas;

To report to the Governor and General Assembly on proposed legislation, policies, regulations, or actions, public or private, which may significantly affect the quality of the natural ecology or the human environment in the Commonwealth. Such report shall include an evaluation of environmental and ecological effects, and shall compare any adverse effects of the proposed action against possible social benefits. The report shall describe and recommend appropriate alternatives, which avoid significant adverse effects on the quality of the natural ecology of natural areas;

To submit to the Governor and members of the General Assembly, a report on or before October 1 of each even-numbered year, detailing the condition of each nature preserve in the system, and each registered natural area, and make other reports and recommendations as it may deem advisable.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 16; 2017 ch. 117, § 12, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 33, effective July 14, 2018.

146.490.
Custody of nature preserve.

An owner of an area which is dedicated as a nature preserve may retain custody thereof, or may designate a custodian, subject to the rules and regulations of the office. If the owner or custodian declines, is unable, or fails to administer and manage the nature preserve in accordance with the articles of dedication, the office shall undertake such custodial functions as may be necessary for the protection, maintenance, and use of the nature preserve until the disability is removed. Whenever feasible, and consistent with the articles of dedication, the office shall vest custody of a nature preserve in the former owner, a private organization or an individual.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 17; 2018 ch. 29, § 34, effective July 14, 2018.

146.495.
Custody, maintenance, and operation.

The office may, with the approval of the cabinet, transfer title, lease, or assign custody or other interest or right therein, or contract for the custody, maintenance, and operation of a nature preserve or other real property with another public agency or private organization. Such transfer, lease, assignment or contract must be consistent with the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 18; 2018 ch. 29, § 35, effective July 14, 2018.

146.500.
Tax assessments.

Where an interest in real property less than fee simple is dedicated for the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, assessments made on the property for taxation shall reflect any change in the market value of the property which may result from the interest so dedicated. The value of the interest so dedicated shall be exempt from property taxation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 19.

146.505.
Dedication or acquisition of land for nature preserve.

All units, departments, agencies, and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth, including, but not limited to, counties, municipalities, public corporations, boards, commissions, colleges, and universities, are empowered and urged to dedicate as nature preserves suitable areas or portions of areas within their jurisdiction; all counties and municipalities within the Commonwealth shall have the authority to acquire any interest in real property for the purposes described in KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 20.

146.507.
Acquisition or dedication of less than a fee simple estate in land.

Where the acquisition or dedication of less than a fee simple estate in land is proposed, and the mineral estate is severed from the surface, the consent of the owner of the mineral estate shall be provided to the office prior to approval of the acquisition or dedication.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 416, § 3, effective June 1, 1988; 2018 ch. 29, § 36, effective July 14, 2018.

146.510.
Construction of KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

Nothing contained in KRS 146.410 to 146.530 shall be construed as interfering with the purposes stated in the establishment of any national, state or local park, preserve, wildlife refuge, wildlife management area, forest or other similar area or the proper management and development thereof, except that any agency administering a natural area dedicated as a nature preserve under the provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530 shall be responsible for preserving the character of the natural area in accordance with the articles of dedication and the applicable rules and regulations with respect thereto established by the office under KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

Neither the dedication of a natural area as a nature preserve, nor any action taken by the office under any of the provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, shall void or replace any protective status under law which the natural area would have were it not a nature preserve, and the protective provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530 shall be supplemental thereto.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 21; 2018 ch. 29, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

146.515.
Cooperation of state agencies — Access to state and local government records.

All departments, agencies, officers and employees of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the office and its employees in carrying out its functions under KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

The executive director or any employee authorized by the executive director shall, for purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, have complete and timely access to all records of every agency, division or department of state, county or city government within the Commonwealth. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the office to disclose those matters which by law are required to be kept confidential.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 22; 2018 ch. 29, § 38, effective July 14, 2018.

146.520.
Nature preserves fund created.

A fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530 is hereby created and is designated the “Kentucky nature preserves fund” and shall consist of all revenues derived from privileges, concessions, and contracts granted by the office, and all moneys received by it from gifts, contributions, donations and grants from governmental or private sources, and moneys appropriated from general funds of the state for the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530. The Kentucky nature preserves fund shall be disbursed by the office, for administration and other expenses and for all purposes provided by KRS 146.410 to 146.530.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 24; 2018 ch. 29, § 39, effective July 14, 2018.

146.525.
Office of Legal Services or Attorney General to bring legal action.

It shall be the duty of the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services, or upon the secretary’s request of the Attorney General, to bring any appropriate legal action in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including but not limited to, actions for restraining orders, or for temporary or permanent injunctions for the prevention or correction of conditions which constitute a violation of KRS 146.200 to 146.619 or the provisions of the articles of dedication.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 25; 2018 ch. 29, § 40, effective July 14, 2018.

146.530.
Appeals.

Administrative appeals from any order or final determination by the office under KRS 146.410 to 146.530 shall be made in accordance with procedures established by regulations of the office.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 28; 2018 ch. 29, § 41, effective July 14, 2018.

146.535.
Title.

KRS 146.410 to 146.530 shall be known and may be cited as the “Kentucky Nature Preserves Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 118, § 1.